Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-410
Precinct, township, city of the second class, or village bonds; issuance; conditions; record.

If a majority of the votes cast at such election are in favor of the proposition, the county board, city council of cities of the second class, or board of trustees of villages shall, as the case may be, without delay, cause to be prepared and shall issue the bonds in accordance with the petition and notice of election. The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson of the county board, or the person authorized to sign county bonds, and be attested by the county clerk, mayor and city clerk of cities of the second class, chairperson of the board of trustees and village clerk of villages, and be attested by the respective seals. The county clerk, village clerk of villages, or city clerk of cities of the second class, as the case may be, shall enter upon the records of the board or council, the petition, bond, notice and call for the election, canvass of the vote, the number, amount, and interest, and the date at which each bond issued shall become payable.

Laws 1885, c. 58, § 2, p. 269;

Laws 1899, c. 49, § 2, p. 262;

R.S.1913, § 414;

Laws 1917, c. 8, § 1, p. 62;

C.S.1922, § 331;

C.S.1929, § 11-410;

R.S.1943, § 10-410;

Laws 1967, c. 33, § 2, p. 154;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 12.

Two-thirds majority vote is required to give validity to bonds. Lang v. Sanitary District, 160 Neb. 754, 71 N.W.2d 608 (1955).